Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-162 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services, in cooperation with the Oklahoma State Department of
Education, shall solicit proposals for, and if funds are available,
make grants to local boards of education for the establishment of
pilot programs that utilize artificial intelligence (AI) software as
Req. No. 11535 Page 1

a sa fety tool to monitor school issued devices. The proposals for
the pilot programs shall create an AI inference engine that provides
school districts with precise insights into student safety and
readiness to learn and utilize CIPA complaint web filtering and
other existing and approved data channels to produce a report
concerning a student's readiness to learn, interests, general well-
being, and other multi-tiered systems of support (MTSS) without
requiring direct surveillance of students. Funding may cover the
cost of software, equipment, materials, personnel, and any other
start-up costs of developing the pilot program. Programs may
involve entire districts, combinations of districts, combinations of
schools, or elements of schools individually or in combination.
B. The Oklahoma Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services, in cooperation with the Oklahoma State Department of
Education, shall determine pilot program criteria and establish a
process for the consideration of proposals. Such proposals for
pilot programs shall be considered on a statewide competitive basis.
C. The Oklahoma Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services and the State Board of Education shall each have the
authority to require termination of a pilot program or its
continuation at any time that it finds such termination to be in the
best interests of the students involved.


Req. No. 11535 Page 2

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 26-163 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services to be designated the “AI School Safety Pilot Programs
Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received
by the Department from state appropriations provided for the purpose
of implementing the provisions of Section 1 of this act. All monies
accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may
be budgeted and expended by the Department for the purpose provided
for in this subsection. Expenditures from the fund shall be made
upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11535 AQH 01/08/25





Req. No. 11535 Page 3